Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,322
Department; include information on website.

(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the department shall include on its website:

(a) A copy of all battery stewardship plans approved under section 81-15,317 and any amendments to such plans;

(b) The names of the producer members covered under an approved battery stewardship plan;

(c) A list of brands of covered batteries covered under an approved battery stewardship plan; and

(d) A copy of each annual report submitted to the department under subsection (1) of section 81-15,321.

(2) Any proprietary information submitted to the department under this section shall not be included on the department's website and shall not be subject to public disclosure pursuant to sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.

Laws 2025, LB36, § 9.